Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3474.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [469.1767] REMEDIES FOR LABOR LAW VIOLATIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Remedies. new text end new text begin If the municipality makes a finding, pursuant to the requirements of subdivision 2, that a developer, contractor, or subcontractor violated state or municipal labor laws in developing a project approved by the municipality, the authority may, notwithstanding any contract, note, or agreement to the contrary, stop payments of increment to a developer, property owner, or note holder for costs of activities incurred in developing the project, including payments for any interest accrued through the financing of such costs. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Public notice, hearing, and discussion required. new text end new text begin (a) The municipality shall make a finding of a labor law violation only after a public hearing thereon after published notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality at least once not less than ten days nor more than 30 days prior to the date of the hearing. The notice must include the proposed findings to be adopted at the hearing. new text end new text begin (b) A finding of a labor law violation must include a citation to the labor law found to be violated and facts supporting the finding, including the dates, times, or locations of any alleged violations. new text end new text begin (c) Before the finding is adopted or at the hearing at which it is to be adopted, any developer, property owner, or note holder connected with the project may file a written objection with the clerk of the municipality. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Challenge in district court. new text end new text begin (a) Within 30 days after the municipality makes a finding under subdivision 2, any person or entity found to have violated a labor law may bring suit for equitable relief or for damages. Within 30 days after the authority stops payment under subdivision 1, any person or entity to whom payments are stopped may bring suit for equitable relief or for damages. new text end new text begin (b) A court hearing a challenge under paragraph (a) shall rule in favor of the challenger if it finds either that the procedures set forth in subdivision 2 were not followed or that the law cited in the finding was not violated. new text end new text begin (c) The prevailing party in a suit filed under this subdivision is entitled to costs, including reasonable attorney fees. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to all districts for which the request for certification was made after the day following final enactment. new text end